Ohio, session 136, SB328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3313.603, 3313.6020, 3313.617, 3314.03, 3317.014, 3326.11, and 3328.24 be amended and sections 3301.0733, 3301.14, 3301.141, 3301.142, 3313.6034, and 3313.6115 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3301.0733. (A) The department of education and workforce shall do all of the following: (1) Not later than March 15, 2027, develop professional skills standards aligned to the essential workplace skills needed by employers in this state; (2) Not later than March 15, 2027, in consultation with career education and workforce development stakeholders, establish a statewide career coaching framework. The framework, at a minimum, shall include all of the following: (a) Indicators of quality career coaching sessions, including length, timing, and frequency recommendations; (b) Career-coaching session objectives, including assessment interpretation, career pathway exposure, reflections on experiential learning, and plan development; (c) Qualifications and training for individuals that provide career coaching, including the role of a valid Ohio school counselor license and other educators licensed under Chapter 3319. of the Revised Code. (3) Provide guidance to districts and schools on how to use the framework, including how the framework may apply to and enhance a district's or school's existing career coaching program, and how to work with business advisory councils and career-technical planning districts to implement the framework and comply with section 3313.6034 of the Revised Code; (4) Identify professional development resources to support the requirement under section 3313.6034 of the Revised Code, such as online learning modules, for career exploration instruction and quality career coaching aligned to the framework, from which school districts and schools may select when preparing educators and coaches. (B) In addition to the responsibilities described in division (A) of this section, the department shall facilitate compliance with section 3313.6034 of the Revised Code by doing all of the following: (1) Issuing guidance on high-quality career exploration instruction and activities, delivery models using courses and multi-year approaches, including which current or new courses may be used to satisfy the requirement, free tools and resources schools may use for career exploration instruction, and potential funding sources such as career awareness and exploration funds; (2) Updating the professional development provided for the middle school career-technical education license validation to align with the career exploration instruction requirements; (3) Publicly reporting how each school is providing career exploration instruction to students, including the number of students served in grades six, seven, and eight. The department shall report which schools are enrolling students in a course that meets the requirements, which schools are enrolling students in a career-technical education course that also meets the career exploration instruction requirement, which schools are providing career exploration through an approved plan, and which schools are out of compliance with the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6034 of the Revised Code. (4) Developing and releasing a template for the career exploration plan that school districts and schools may submit to describe how the district or school will provide career exploration instruction required under division (A) of section 3313.6034 of the Revised Code; (5) Reviewing, approving, and posting career exploration plans; (6) Auditing up to five per cent of schools annually to monitor compliance and enforcing compliance through intervention and support measures when necessary. Audits may be conducted by the department or another qualified entity as determined by the department, including regional entities with expertise in career education. Sec. 3301.14. (A) The department of education and workforce shall establish the education and workforce return on investment initiative to make education and workforce data more useful, applicable, and beneficial to Ohio citizens. The initiative shall work to secure linkages of cross-agency data and build system capacity to support research that gives insight to the education and workforce pipeline to students, families, educators, workforce leaders, employers, policymakers, researchers, and other stakeholders. The initiative shall provide collaborative policy leadership on education and workforce data and publicly share tools, dashboards, and research insights while protecting data privacy and system security. (B)(1) The leadership team of the education and workforce return on investment initiative shall consist of the following: (a) The director of education and workforce; (b) The director of children and youth; (c) The chancellor of higher education; (d) The director of job and family services; (e) The director of development; (f) The director of the governor's office of workforce transformation. (2) The governor may designate additional cabinet directors, data and technology experts, researchers, or stakeholder representatives to the leadership team. All members of the leadership team serve at the pleasure of the governor and do not have terms. (3) The leadership team shall select one of its members to convene the initiative's meetings and to provide logistical support to the initiative in collaboration with partner organizations, as deemed necessary. (4) Each member of the leadership team shall attend meetings of the initiative. When a director is not able to attend a meeting, the director may appoint a temporary designee to serve in the director's place. The temporary designee shall be a senior leader from that director's department who has decision-making authority over the agency's data and policy functions, such as a deputy director or chief of staff. (C) The leadership team may invite other cabinet directors, agency staff, data and technology experts, researchers, or stakeholder representatives to participate in the initiative in working groups or advisory boards. No members of the initiative shall have access to personally identifiable information only by virtue of being members of the initiative. (D) Not later than two hundred seventy days after the effective date of this section, the members of the initiative shall develop a vision, mission, and strategic plan that shall be reviewed at least once every five years. (E) The members of the initiative shall adhere to all relevant state and federal privacy and data security laws including section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 20 U.S.C. 1232g. Sec. 3301.141. (A)(1) The leadership team of the education and workforce return on investment initiative established under section 3301.14 of the Revised Code shall identify and secure the means to implement its activities and objectives established under section 3301.142 of the Revised Code. The leadership team shall identify the entity or entities that will support the initiative and implement those activities and objectives, which may include state agency staff, universities, or other external entities. (2) The leadership team may recommend the creation of a single, independent entity to implement activities and objectives of the initiative. The recommendation shall specify a governance structure for the entity so that it is not governed by one state agency. However, the entity may be housed within an agency and use shared services. If an independent entity is created under this division, the leadership team of the initiative shall do all of the following: (a) Identify the entity's roles and responsibilities; (b) Secure funding and support for the entity; (c) Appoint and oversee the leader of the entity; (d) Designate a cross-agency governance structure to oversee the operations and regulatory compliance of the entity. (B)(1) The initiative shall meet at least quarterly in a public setting. The member designated to convene the initiative's meetings shall do both of the following: (a) Publish notice of each meeting's date, time, and location at least one week in advance; (b) Post meeting materials and, if possible, recordings to a dedicated web site for the initiative following each meeting. (2) The members of the initiative shall not publicly review personally identifiable information during meetings or post personally identifiable information as part of the meeting materials. The leadership team may invite stakeholders and researchers to present and offer feedback during initiative meetings. (C) Leadership team members shall engage the stakeholders their agencies represent in the work of the initiative. Each leadership team member must do all of the following at least once per year: (1) Hold a public meeting, which may be part of an existing stakeholder meeting, with a broad range of agency stakeholders to share all of the following: (a) The strategic plan and research framework for the initiative, including recent accomplishments and planned work; (b) The agency's role and priorities related to the initiative's strategic plan and research framework; (c) The progress the agency and overall initiative are making toward implementing the strategic plan and research framework, including new research, reports, and data tools developed within the initiative; (2) Solicit formal feedback from a broad range of stakeholders on all of the following in one or several public or private meetings: (a) The information and outcomes stakeholders want to know more about, including potential research questions related to longitudinal data, student outcomes, and return on investment; (b) The research, reports, and data tools that would help stakeholders in their work; (c) The challenges stakeholders experience trying to access and use longitudinal and outcomes data. (3) Compile a summary of the stakeholder feedback into a written brief and present it during a meeting of the initiative. (D) The initiative annually shall submit a report to the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate that includes all of the following: (1) The initiative's mission, vision, and progress implementing its strategic plan and its plans for the next year; (2) The research framework created under section 3301.142 of the Revised Code and progress implementing the framework; (3) A digest of the tools, dashboards, reports, and research produced using cross-agency education and workforce data, noting the extent to which each responds to the stakeholder input collected by the leadership team; (4) Metrics on the access and use of education and workforce data overseen by the leadership team of the initiative, including the number of access requests fulfilled, not fulfilled, reasons the requests were not fulfilled, and average time for access requests to be resolved; (5) Any recommendations for improving the governance, administration, or system security of the data systems that support the initiative's mission and research framework the initiative's leadership team chooses to include. (E) The leadership team or designated members of the leadership team shall present the report prescribed in division (D) of this section and any additional information to the governor's executive workforce board established under section 6301.04 of the Revised Code at least once a year. Sec. 3301.142. The education and workforce return on investment initiative established under section 3301.14 of the Revised Code shall work to achieve the following objectives: (A) Create a research framework that reflects the broad, cross-agency policy areas that are priorities for policy leaders and state agencies related to education and workforce. The research framework shall guide where research is needed and help prioritize state research and data access requests. The members of the initiative shall do all of the following for the research framework: (1) Integrate stakeholder feedback collected by the initiative's leadership team; (2) Ensure that the necessary data connections exist to implement the research framework; (3) Align with other research frameworks and agendas, including the higher education public policy research consortium established under section 3333.952 of the Revised Code; (4) Discuss the progress implementing the research framework at each meeting; (5) Update the framework every two years with stakeholder input. (B) Develop and recommend agencies adopt a data access and use policy for cross-agency data requests that streamlines data access for stakeholders. The policy shall be guided by and adhere to all relevant state and federal privacy and data security laws including section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 20 U.S.C. 1232g. All members of the initiative's leadership team shall adopt the data access and use policy. (C) Identify and implement strategies to make data collection and reporting more efficient for local and regional education and workforce entities so as to reduce duplication of efforts and make reporting easier for local schools and other institutions. (D) Take actions to increase the capacity of the state to securely process cross-agency data access and research requests with the goal of reducing the time and cost required to fulfill such requests. (E) Support other critical education and workforce initiatives adopted by the state that rely on cross-agency data and, when possible, support local and regional education and workforce initiatives. (F) Coordinate the creation of tools, dashboards, reports, and research that use existing cross-agency education and workforce data. Beginning on December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter on a date determined by the report's lead agency, this shall include all of the following reports: (1) A high school graduate report for each school district and other public school, as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, that includes postsecondary enrollment and workforce outcomes of recent graduates, including how well the performance measures found in the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component prescribed in division (D)(3)(f) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code predict success after graduation; (2) A talent gap report that compares the job openings and annual wages for in-demand sectors with the number of graduates from related programs each year on a statewide and regional basis; (3) An industry-recognized credential outcomes report that includes workforce outcomes for common industry-recognized credentials earned in the state, which shall include at least the credentials on the state's approved list; (4) A higher education graduate report that documents the employment, wage, and retention outcomes of graduates for each institution of higher education in this state; (5) A workforce program outcomes report that documents completion rates, as well as the employment, wage, and retention outcomes after exit, of participants in workforce training programs in this state that are included on the workforce inventory of education and training or its successor and on any analogous training provider lists managed by local workforce development areas. (G) Share and promote the tools, dashboards, reports, and research created by the members of the initiative using cross-agency education and workforce data. Additionally, the members of the initiative may share and promote similarly aligned resources created by other entities, including state agencies, with the permission of the originating entity. (H) Discuss and direct the implementation of enhancements to education and workforce data systems, technologies, data security, and privacy. Sec. 3313.603. (A) As used in this section: (1) "One unit" means a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of course instruction, except that for a laboratory course, "one unit" means a minimum of one hundred fifty hours of course instruction. (2) "One-half unit" means a minimum of sixty hours of course instruction, except that for physical education courses, "one-half unit" means a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of course instruction. (B) Beginning September 15, 2001, except as required in division (C) of this section and division (C) of section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, the requirements for graduation from every high school shall include twenty units earned in grades nine through twelve and shall be distributed as follows: (1) English language arts, four units; (2) Health, one-half unit; (3) Mathematics, three units; (4) Physical education, one-half unit; (5) Science, two units until September 15, 2003, and three units thereafter, which at all times shall include both of the following: (a) Biological sciences, one unit; (b) Physical sciences, one unit. (6) History and government, one unit, which shall comply with division (M) of this section and shall include both of the following: (a) American history, one-half unit; (b) American government, one-half unit. (7) Social studies, two units. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2017, the two units of instruction prescribed by division (B)(7) of this section shall include at least one-half unit of instruction in the study of world history and civilizations. (8) Elective units, seven units until September 15, 2003, and six units thereafter. Each student's electives shall include at least one unit, or two half units, chosen from among the areas of business/technology, fine arts, and/or foreign language. (C) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, except as provided in divisions (D) to (F) of this section, the requirements for graduation from every public and chartered nonpublic high school shall include twenty units that are designed to prepare students for the workforce and college. The units shall be distributed as follows: (1) English language arts, four units; (2) Health, one-half unit, which shall include instruction in nutrition and the benefits of nutritious foods and physical activity for overall health; (3) Mathematics, four units, which shall include one unit of algebra II or the equivalent of algebra II, or one unit of advanced computer science as described in the standards adopted pursuant to division (A)(4) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. However, students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2015, and who are pursuing a career-technical instructional track shall not be required to take algebra II or advanced computer science, and instead may complete a career-based pathway mathematics course approved by the department of education and workforce as an alternative. For students who choose to take advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II under division (C)(3) of this section, the school shall communicate to those students that some institutions of higher education may require algebra II for the purpose of college admission. Also, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of each student who chooses to take advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II shall sign and submit to the school a document containing a statement acknowledging that not taking algebra II may have an adverse effect on college admission decisions. A student may fulfill one unit of mathematics under division (C)(3) of this section by completing one-half unit of financial literacy instruction to satisfy the requirement prescribed under division (C)(9) of this section and one-half unit of a mathematics course. The one-half unit course in mathematics shall not be in algebra II, or its equivalent, or a course for which the department requires an end-of-course examination under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. Students who choose to take one unit of advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II, as described in division (C)(3) of this section, shall not be permitted to complete one-half unit of financial literacy instruction to satisfy the mathematics unit requirements of that division. Instead, those students shall be required to complete the one-half unit of financial literacy instruction under division (C)(8) of this section. (4) Physical education, one-half unit; (5) Science, three units with inquiry-based laboratory experience that engages students in asking valid scientific questions and gathering and analyzing information, which shall include the following, or their equivalent: (a) Physical sciences, one unit; (b) Life sciences, one unit; (c) Advanced study in one or more of the following sciences, one unit: (i) Chemistry, physics, or other physical science; (ii) Advanced biology or other life science; (iii) Astronomy, physical geology, or other earth or space science; (iv) Computer science. No student shall substitute a computer science course for a life sciences or biology course under division (C)(5) of this section. (6) History and government, one unit, which shall comply with division (M) of this section and shall include both of the following: (a) American history, one-half unit; (b) American government, one-half unit. (7) Social studies, two units. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2017, the two units of instruction prescribed by division (C)(7) of this section shall include at least one-half unit of instruction in the study of world history and civilizations. (8) Five units consisting of one or any combination of foreign language, fine arts, business, career-technical education, family and consumer sciences, technology which may include computer science, agricultural education, a junior reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code, or English language arts, mathematics, science, or social studies courses not otherwise required under division (C) of this section. One-half unit of instruction under division (C)(8) of this section may be instruction in financial literacy to satisfy the requirement under division (C)(9) of this section. (9)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(9)(b) of this section, for students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2022, financial literacy, one-half unit. Each student shall elect to complete the one-half unit of instruction in financial literacy either in lieu of one-half unit of instruction in mathematics under division (C)(3) of this section or an elective under division (C)(8) of this section. A student may fulfill the financial literacy instruction requirement under division (C)(9) of this section through the successful completion of an advanced placement course in microeconomics or macroeconomics. (b) A student attending a nonpublic school accredited through the independent schools association of the central states or any other chartered nonpublic school shall not be required to complete the one-half unit of financial literacy instruction prescribed in division (C)(9)(a) of this section, unless that student is attending the school under a state scholarship program as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. The study and instruction of financial literacy required under division (C)(9) of this section shall align with the academic content standards for financial literacy and entrepreneurship adopted under division (A)(2) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. The instruction provided under an advanced placement course in microeconomics or macroeconomics shall be considered to be aligned with those academic content standards. In developing the curriculum for the study and instruction of financial literacy, schools may use available public-private partnerships and resources and materials that exist in business, industry, and through the centers for economics education at institutions of higher education. Ohioans must be prepared to apply increased knowledge and skills in the workplace and to adapt their knowledge and skills quickly to meet the rapidly changing conditions of the twenty-first century. National studies indicate that all high school graduates need the same academic foundation, regardless of the opportunities they pursue after graduation. The goal of Ohio's system of elementary and secondary education is to prepare all students for and seamlessly connect all students to success in life beyond high school graduation, regardless of whether the next step is entering the workforce, beginning an apprenticeship, engaging in post-secondary training, serving in the military, or pursuing a college degree. The requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section are the standard expectation for all students entering ninth grade for the first time at a public or chartered nonpublic high school on or after July 1, 2010. A student may satisfy this expectation through a variety of methods, including, but not limited to, integrated, applied, career-technical, and traditional coursework. Stronger coordination between high schools and institutions of higher education is necessary to prepare students for more challenging academic endeavors and to lessen the need for academic remediation in college, thereby reducing the costs of higher education for Ohio's students, families, and the state. The department and the chancellor of higher education shall develop policies to ensure that only in rare instances will students who complete the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section require academic remediation after high school. School districts, community schools, and chartered nonpublic schools shall integrate technology into learning experiences across the curriculum in order to maximize efficiency, enhance learning, and prepare students for success in the technology-driven twenty-first century. Districts and schools shall use distance and web-based course delivery as a method of providing or augmenting all instruction required under this division, including laboratory experience in science. Districts and schools shall utilize technology access and electronic learning opportunities provided by the broadcast educational media commission, chancellor, the Ohio learning network, education technology centers, public television stations, and other public and private providers. (D) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, a student who enters ninth grade on or after July 1, 2010, and before July 1, 2016, may qualify for graduation from a public or chartered nonpublic high school even though the student has not completed the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) During the student's third year of attending high school, as determined by the school, the student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian sign and file with the school a written statement asserting the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's consent to the student's graduating without completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section and acknowledging that one consequence of not completing those requirements is ineligibility to enroll in most state universities in Ohio without further coursework. (2) The student and parent, guardian, or custodian fulfill any procedural requirements the school stipulates to ensure the student's and parent's, guardian's, or custodian's informed consent and to facilitate orderly filing of statements under division (D)(1) of this section. Annually, each district or school shall notify the department of the number of students who choose to qualify for graduation under division (D) of this section and the number of students who complete the student's success create a graduation and career plan and graduate from high school. (3) The student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian and a representative of the student's high school jointly develop a student success graduation and career plan for the student in the manner described in division (C)(1) of section 3313.6020 3313.617 of the Revised Code that specifies the student matriculating to a two-year degree program, acquiring a business and industry-recognized credential, or entering an apprenticeshipstudent's plans for after high school. (4) The student's high school provides counseling and support for the student related to the plan developed under division (D)(3) of this section during the remainder of the student's high school experience. (5)(a) Except as provided in division (D)(5)(b) of this section, the student successfully completes, at a minimum, the curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section. (b) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, a student shall be required to complete successfully, at the minimum, the curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section, except as follows: (i) Mathematics, four units, one unit which shall be one of the following: (I) Probability and statistics; (II) Computer science; (III) Applied mathematics or quantitative reasoning; (IV) Any other course approved by the department using standards established by the superintendent not later than October 1, 2014. (ii) Elective units, five units; (iii) Science, three units as prescribed by division (B) of this section which shall include inquiry-based laboratory experience that engages students in asking valid scientific questions and gathering and analyzing information. (E) Each school district and chartered nonpublic school retains the authority to require an even more challenging minimum curriculum for high school graduation than specified in division (B) or (C) of this section. A school district board of education, through the adoption of a resolution, or the governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may stipulate any of the following: (1) A minimum high school curriculum that requires more than twenty units of academic credit to graduate; (2) An exception to the district's or school's minimum high school curriculum that is comparable to the exception provided in division (D) of this section but with additional requirements, which may include a requirement that the student successfully complete more than the minimum curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section; (3) That no exception comparable to that provided in division (D) of this section is available. If a school district or chartered nonpublic school requires a foreign language as an additional graduation requirement under division (E) of this section, a student may apply one unit of instruction in computer coding to satisfy one unit of foreign language. If a student applies more than one computer coding course to satisfy the foreign language requirement, the courses shall be sequential and progressively more difficult. (F) A student enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program, which program has received a waiver from the department, may qualify for graduation from high school by successfully completing a competency-based instructional program administered by the dropout prevention and recovery program in lieu of completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section. The department shall grant a waiver to a dropout prevention and recovery program, within sixty days after the program applies for the waiver, if the program meets all of the following conditions: (1) The program serves only students not younger than sixteen years of age and not older than twenty-one years of age. (2) The program enrolls students who, at the time of their initial enrollment, either, or both, are at least one grade level behind their cohort age groups or experience crises that significantly interfere with their academic progress such that they are prevented from continuing their traditional programs. (3) The program requires students to attain at least the applicable score designated for each of the assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or, to the extent prescribed by rule of the department under division (D)(5) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, division (B)(2) of that section. (4) The program develops a student success graduation and career plan for the student in the manner described in division (C)(1) of section 3313.6020 3313.617 of the Revised Code that specifies the student's matriculating to a two-year degree program, acquiring a business and industry-recognized credential, or entering an apprenticeshipplans for after high school. (5) The program provides counseling and support for the student related to the plan developed under division (F)(4) of this section during the remainder of the student's high school experience. (6) The program requires the student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian to sign and file, in accordance with procedural requirements stipulated by the program, a written statement asserting the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's consent to the student's graduating without completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section and acknowledging that one consequence of not completing those requirements is ineligibility to enroll in most state universities in Ohio without further coursework. (7) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department an instructional plan that demonstrates how the academic content standards adopted by the department under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code will be taught and assessed. (8) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department a policy on career advising that satisfies the requirements of section 3313.6020 of the Revised Code, with an emphasis on how every student will receive career advising. (9) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department a written agreement outlining the future cooperation between the program and any combination of local job training, postsecondary education, nonprofit, and health and social service organizations to provide services for students in the program and their families. Divisions (F)(8) and (9) of this section apply only to waivers granted on or after July 1, 2015. If the department does not act either to grant the waiver or to reject the program application for the waiver within sixty days as required under this section, the waiver shall be considered to be granted. (G) Every high school may permit students below the ninth grade to take advanced work. If a high school so permits, it shall award high school credit for successful completion of the advanced work and shall count such advanced work toward the graduation requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section if the advanced work was both: (1) Taught by a person who possesses a license or certificate issued under section 3301.071, 3319.22, or 3319.222 of the Revised Code that is valid for teaching high school; (2) Designated by the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district, the board of the cooperative education school district, or the governing authority of the chartered nonpublic school as meeting the high school curriculum requirements. Each high school shall record on the student's high school transcript all high school credit awarded under division (G) of this section. In addition, if the student completed a seventh- or eighth-grade fine arts course described in division (K) of this section and the course qualified for high school credit under that division, the high school shall record that course on the student's high school transcript. (H) The department shall make its individual academic career plan available through its Ohio career information system web site for districts and schools to use as a tool for communicating with and providing guidance to students and families in selecting high school courses. (I) A school district or chartered nonpublic school may integrate academic content in a subject area for which the department has adopted standards under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code into a course in a different subject area, including a career-technical education course, in accordance with guidance for integrated coursework developed by the department. Upon successful completion of an integrated course, a student may receive credit for both subject areas that were integrated into the course. Units earned for subject area content delivered through integrated academic and career-technical instruction are eligible to meet the graduation requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section. For purposes of meeting graduation requirements, if an end-of-course examination has been prescribed under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code for the subject area delivered through integrated instruction, the school district or school may administer the related subject area examinations upon the student's completion of the integrated course. Nothing in division (I) of this section shall be construed to excuse any school district, chartered nonpublic school, or student from any requirement in the Revised Code related to curriculum, assessments, or the awarding of a high school diploma. (J)(1) The department, in consultation with the chancellor, shall adopt a statewide plan implementing methods for students to earn units of high school credit based on a demonstration of subject area competency, instead of or in combination with completing hours of classroom instruction. The plan shall include a standard method for recording demonstrated proficiency on high school transcripts. Each school district and community school shall comply with the department's plan adopted under this division and award units of high school credit in accordance with the plan. The department may adopt existing methods for earning high school credit based on a demonstration of subject area competency as necessary prior to the 2009-2010 school year. (2) The department shall update the statewide plan adopted pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section to also include methods for students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on a demonstration of subject area competency, instead of or in combination with completing hours of classroom instruction. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, each school district and community school also shall comply with the updated plan adopted pursuant to this division and permit students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency in accordance with the plan. (3) The department shall develop a framework for school districts and community schools to use in granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, each district and community school shall comply with the framework. Each district and community school also shall review any policy it has adopted regarding the demonstration of subject area competency to identify ways to incorporate work-based learning experiences, internships, and cooperative education into the policy in order to increase student engagement and opportunities to earn units of high school credit. (K) This division does not apply to students who qualify for graduation from high school under division (D) or (F) of this section, or to students pursuing a career-technical instructional track as determined by the school district board of education or the chartered nonpublic school's governing authority. Nevertheless, the general assembly encourages such students to consider enrolling in a fine arts course as an elective. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, each student enrolled in a public or chartered nonpublic high school shall complete two semesters or the equivalent of fine arts to graduate from high school. The coursework may be completed in any of grades seven to twelve. Each student who completes a fine arts course in grade seven or eight may elect to count that course toward the five units of electives required for graduation under division (C)(8) of this section, if the course satisfied the requirements of division (G) of this section. In that case, the high school shall award the student high school credit for the course and count the course toward the five units required under division (C)(8) of this section. If the course in grade seven or eight did not satisfy the requirements of division (G) of this section, the high school shall not award the student high school credit for the course but shall count the course toward the two semesters or the equivalent of fine arts required by this division. (L) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the board of education of each school district and the governing authority of each chartered nonpublic school may adopt a policy to excuse from the high school physical education requirement each student who, during high school, has participated in interscholastic athletics, marching band, show choir, or cheerleading for at least two full seasons or in the junior reserve officer training corps for at least two full school years. If the board or authority adopts such a policy, the board or authority shall not require the student to complete any physical education course as a condition to graduate. However, the student shall be required to complete one-half unit, consisting of at least sixty hours of instruction, in another course of study. In the case of a student who has participated in the junior reserve officer training corps for at least two full school years, credit received for that participation may be used to satisfy the requirement to complete one-half unit in another course of study. (M) It is important that high school students learn and understand United States history and the governments of both the United States and the state of Ohio. Therefore, beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2012, the study of American history and American government required by divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of this section shall include the study of all of the following documents: (1) The Declaration of Independence; (2) The Northwest Ordinance; (3) The Constitution of the United States with emphasis on the Bill of Rights; (4) The Ohio Constitution. The study of each of the documents prescribed in divisions (M)(1) to (4) of this section shall include study of that document in its original context. The study of American history and government required by divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of this section shall include the historical evidence of the role of documents such as the Federalist Papers and the Anti-Federalist Papers to firmly establish the historical background leading to the establishment of the provisions of the Constitution and Bill of Rights. (N) A student may apply one unit of instruction in computer science to satisfy one unit of mathematics or one unit of science under division (C) of this section as the student chooses, regardless of the field of certification of the teacher who teaches the course, so long as that teacher meets the licensure requirements prescribed by section 3319.236 of the Revised Code and, prior to teaching the course, completes a professional development program determined to be appropriate by the district board. If a student applies more than one computer science course to satisfy curriculum requirements under that division, the courses shall be sequential and progressively more difficult or cover different subject areas within computer science. (O) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the board of education of each school district and the governing authority of each chartered nonpublic school may adopt a policy to excuse from the financial literacy instruction requirement under division (C)(9) of this section each student who, during high school, participates in a financial literacy program offered through a student branch, as defined in section 1733.04 of the Revised Code, or by a bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code. The policy shall require the financial literacy program to meet or exceed the academic content standards and model curriculum for financial literacy and entrepreneurship instruction adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. The policy shall require a student to participate in the program for the equivalent of at least one-half unit of instruction to qualify for an exemption under this division. Not later than July 1, 2026, the department shall develop and post on its web site a model policy and guidelines for districts and schools to use in developing a policy under this division. Sec. 3313.6020. (A)(1) Beginning in the 2015-2016 school year, the board of education of each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district shall adopt a policy on career advising that complies with this section. Thereafter, the policy shall be updated at least once every two years. (2) The board shall make the policy publicly available to students, parents, guardians, or custodians, local post-secondary institutions, and residents of the district. The district shall post the policy in a prominent location on its web site, if it has one. (B) The policy on career advising shall specify how the district will do all of the following: (1) Provide students with grade-level examples that link their schoolwork to one or more career fields. A district may use career connections developed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code for this purpose. (2) Create a plan in consultation with the district's career technical planning district and business advisory council to provide career advising to students in grades six through twelve; (3) Beginning in the 2015-2016 school year, provide additional interventions and career advising for students who are identified as at risk of dropping out of school in accordance with division (C) of this section 3313.617 of the Revised Code; (4) Train its employees on how to advise students on career pathways, including training on advising students using online tools; (5) Develop multiple, clear academic pathways through high school that students may choose in order to earn a high school diploma; (6) Identify and publicize courses that can award students both traditional academic and career-technical credit; (7) Document the career advising provided to each student for review by the student, the student's parent, guardian, or custodian, and future schools that the student may attend. A district shall not otherwise release this information without the written consent of the student's parent, guardian, or custodian, if the student is less than eighteen years old, or the written consent of the student, if the student is at least eighteen years old. (8) Prepare students for their transition from high school to their post-secondary destinations, including any special interventions that are necessary for students in need of remediation in mathematics or English language arts; (9) Include information regarding career fields that require an industry-recognized credential, certificate, associate's degree, bachelor's degree, graduate degree, or professional degree; (10) Provide students with information about ways a student may offset the costs of a post-secondary education, including programs such as all of the following: (a) The reserve officer training corps; (b) The college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code; (c) The Ohio guaranteed transfer pathways initiative established under section 3333.168 of the Revised Code; (d) Joint academic programming or dual enrollment opportunities required under section 3333.168 of the Revised Code. The chancellor of higher education shall develop informational materials that illustrate cost saving estimates for each of the options listed under division (B)(10) of this section. The chancellor shall develop a list of individual college courses that are transferable under section 3333.16 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Beginning in the 2015-2016 school year, each district shall identify students who are at risk of dropping out of school using a method that is both research-based and locally-based and that is developed with input from the district's classroom teachers and guidance counselors. If a student is identified as at risk of dropping out of school, the district shall develop a student success plan that addresses the student's academic pathway to a successful graduation and the role of career-technical education, competency-based education, and experiential learning, as appropriate, in that pathway. (2) Prior to developing a student success plan for a student, the district shall invite the student's parent, guardian, or custodian to assist in developing the plan. If the student's parent, guardian, or custodian does not participate in the development of the plan, the district shall provide to the parent, guardian, or custodian a copy of the student's success plan and a statement of the importance of a high school diploma and the academic pathways available to the student in order to successfully graduate. (3) Following the development of a student success plan for a student, the district shall provide career advising to the student that is aligned with the plan and, beginning in the 2015-2016 school year, the district's plan to provide career advising created under division (B)(2) of this section. (D)(1) The department of education and workforce shall develop and post on its web site model policies on career advising and model student success plans. (2) The department shall create an online clearinghouse of research related to proven practices for policies on career advising and student success plans that districts may access when fulfilling the requirements of this section. (3) The department shall develop and make available informational materials for students in grades seven and eight about career opportunities available to them, including in-demand jobs as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code, and how a career-technical education may help them satisfy graduation conditions under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. (4) The department, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall develop career pathways resources for students. Each school district annually shall distribute the resource in a manner determined by the department to each student in grades six through twelve. Sec. 3313.6034. (A) Beginning with the students who enter the sixth grade for the first time in the 2027-2028 school year, each school district shall provide at least sixty hours of instruction in the study of career exploration to students at any point during grades six through eight. School districts shall provide instruction in the study of career exploration by doing either of the following: (1) Offering a career exploration course at some point during grades six through eight for all students. The course shall address all the essential components of career exploration instruction prescribed in division (B) of this section. If a school provides its students with a career-technical education course in seventh or eighth grade, as required by section 3313.90 of Revised Code, and the course satisfies the instructional criteria described in division (B) of this section, the same course may fulfill both requirements for the district. (2) Submitting a career exploration plan to the department of education and workforce for approval. The plan shall do both of the following: (a) Be developed in collaboration with the district's partners, including the district's career-technical planning district and business advisory council; (b) Document how the school will address the essential components of career exploration instruction prescribed in division (B) of this section in a series of experiences for all students in a cohort in a single year or across grades six through eight. A plan approved by the department under this section shall be valid for a minimum of two years but not longer than five years and may be renewed in a form and manner determined by the department. The department may work with the career pathway support networks designated by the department to approve plans. (B) The career exploration instruction provided to each student shall include each of the following essential components: (1) Career field exploration, including an overview of the sixteen career clusters identified by the department for the state; (2) Experiential learning opportunities, such as research projects, guest speakers and job shadowing; (3) Life budgeting and financial planning exercises; (4) Interest and aptitude assessments; (5) Professional skills development that aligns with the state's professional skills standards created under section 3301.0733 of the Revised Code; (6) At least one quality career coaching session per student that aligns with the career coaching framework created under section 3301.0733 of the Revised Code and documents learning in the student's career and academic plan; (7) Career and academic planning, including the development of each student's career and academic plan, as prescribed by section 3313.6115 of the Revised Code, or a preliminary plan if the instruction is completed before eighth grade. (C) School districts may assign district personnel, including counselors, career coaches, or teachers, to provide all or part of the career exploration instruction and planning required for students. School districts also may partner with outside organizations to provide all or part of the career exploration instruction required for students. Sec. 3313.617. Not later than June 30, 2020, each Each board of education of a school district and governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall adopt a policy regarding students who are at risk of not qualifying for a high school diploma. The policy shall require the district or school to do all of the following: (A) Develop criteria for identifying at-risk students, which shall include a student's lack of adequate progress in meeting the terms of a graduation plan developed or updated under division (E) of this section. The criteria also may include other factors, such as if a student has issues regarding excessive absences or misconduct. (B) Develop procedures for identifying at-risk students. The procedures shall include a method for determining if a student is not making adequate progress in meeting the terms of a graduation plan developed or updated under division (E) of this section. The procedures that shall allow for a student to be identified as at risk in each of grades nine through twelve. The procedures also may include the identification of students in other grades. (C) Develop a notification process in which the district or school shall notify an at-risk student's parent, guardian, or custodian in each year in which the student has been identified as at risk. The notification process shall at least include providing a written notification to the at-risk student's parent, guardian, or custodian, which shall include all of the following: (1) A statement that the student is at risk of not qualifying for a high school diploma; (2) A description of the district's or school's curriculum requirements, or the student's individualized education program, and, as appropriate, the graduation conditions prescribed under section 3313.618 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code; (3) A description of any additional instructional or support services available to the at-risk student through the district or school. (D) Assist at-risk students with additional instructional or support services to help the students qualify for a high school diploma. The instructional and support services may include any of the following: (1) Mentoring programs; (2) Tutoring programs; (3) High school credit through demonstrations of subject area competency under division (J) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code; (4) Adjusted curriculum options; (5) Career-technical programs; (6) Mental health services; (7) Physical health care services; (8) Family engagement and support services. (E)(1) Develop a graduation and career plan for each student enrolled in grades nine through twelve in the district or school who is at risk of not qualifying for a high school diploma. The graduation and career plan shall address the student's academic pathway to meet the curriculum requirements specified by the district or school and satisfy the graduation conditions, as appropriate, under section 3313.618 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code. The plan also shall identify post-graduation career goals and align the students's high school experience to those goals. (2) The graduation and career plan shall be developed jointly by the student and a representative of the district or school andor a representative of an organization the district or school partners with for career planning and advising supports. The plan shall be updated by the student and the representative involved in the development of the plan each school year in which the student is enrolled in the district or school, until the student qualifies for a high school diploma. The district or school shall invite a student's parent, guardian, or custodian to assist in developing and updating the graduation and career plan. (3) A district or school shall include a student's lack of progress in meeting the terms of a graduation plan developed or updated under this division as both a criterion for identifying at-risk students under division (A) of this section and a procedure for identifying at-risk students under division (B) of this section. (4) A graduation If a student identified at risk by this section has a career and academic plan developed under this section shall supplement a 3313.6115 of the Revised Code, the school district's policy on career advising adopted under section 3313.6020 of the Revised Codedistrict shall develop a graduation planning addendum to the career and academic plan instead of a separate graduation and career plan. The graduation planning addendum shall meet the requirements of division (E) of this section, except that references to the graduation and career plan apply to the graduation planning addendum. (5)(4) A school district may use the individualized education program developed for a student pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code in lieu of developing a graduation and career plan or graduation planning addendum under this division, if the individualized education program contains academic goals substantively similar to a graduation and career plan or a graduation planplanning addendum. Sec. 3313.6115. (A) Beginning with students who enter sixth grade for the first time in the 2027-2028 school year, each school district shall require each sixth grade student to complete a career and academic plan by the end of the student's eighth grade year. The plan shall be evaluated annually to monitor progress and make adjustments as necessary. A student's career and academic plan shall include all of the following: (1) A list of the student's strengths, interests, and aptitudes; (2) An explanation of planned and completed career exploration activities aligned to the student's career pathway, including career coaching; (3) Career and academic goals, financial and life goals, and action plans, including how students will identify and update these goals as they move through high school and beyond; (4) A description of the pathway the student will take to meet the requirements for high school graduation prescribed under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code and the post-graduation career goals outlined in that pathway. The plan shall also include how the student will consider pathway experiences such as career-technical education programming, the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, the accelerated college and career pathways program established under section 3345.89 of the Revised Code, or other similar state or local programs. Future updates to the student's plan shall address these options in more detail. (5) A description or record of any work-based and other career-based learning opportunities the student plans to participate in to inform their career and academic plan. The learning opportunities shall be, to the greatest extent possible, integrated into a student's academic instruction. (6) A plan for the development of a student's professional skills and how the student will practice those skills through both in- and out-of-school experiences. A career and academic plan for a student entering twelfth grade for the first time in a school year shall require that student to develop a professional resume based on the plan not later than the first day of January of that school year. (B)(1) A school district shall involve parents and guardians in the development of career and academic plans, and the parent or guardian shall provide a written signature in approval of the final plan. If a parent or guardian is unable to participate or provide written approval, the district shall designate a career coach to provide the student additional career coaching aligned to the quality career coaching framework under section 3301.0733 of the Revised Code. (2) Parents and guardians shall receive at least one update annually on the progress their student makes implementing the career and academic plan, which shall include a copy of the plan itself and the contact information for a person who can answer questions about the plan. (3) The career and academic plans shall be accessible to parents and guardians throughout the year and be transferable between schools to follow the student, including from middle school to high school and between school districts. (C) The department of education and workforce shall develop a template and guidance for career and academic plans to support the implementation of this section. (D) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in division (A) of this section, beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, a school district may provide a career and academic plan to students in any grade. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission and educational philosophy, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.6034, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114, and 3313.6115 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (m) The school will comply with section 3313.7118 of the Revised Code if it serves elementary school students. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (D) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, both of the following: (a) Specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (b) Alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion. (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (34) A provision establishing the process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future. (35) A description of the management and administration of the school. (36) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt policies and procedures to establish internal financial controls for the school. (B) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (C) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (D) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (E) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.014. (A) The multiples for the following categories of career-technical education programs approved by the department of education and workforce under section 3317.161 of the Revised Code shall be as follows: (1) A multiple of 0.6230 for students enrolled in career-technical education workforce development programs in agricultural and environmental systems, construction technologies, engineering and science technologies, finance, health science, information technology, and manufacturing technologies, each of which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation; (2) A multiple of 0.5905 for students enrolled in workforce development programs in business and administration, hospitality and tourism, human services, law and public safety, transportation systems, and arts and communications, each of which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation; (3) A multiple of 0.2154 for students enrolled in career-based intervention programs, which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation; (4) A multiple of 0.1830 for students enrolled in workforce development programs in education and training, marketing, workforce development academics, public administration, and career development, each of which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation; (5) A multiple of 0.1570 for students enrolled in family and consumer science programs, which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation. (B) The multiple for career-technical education associated services, as defined by the department, shall be 0.0294. (C) The department shall calculate career-technical education funds for each funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district or the community and STEM school unit as follows: (1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the sum of the following: (a) The funding unit's category one career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(1) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage; (b) The funding unit's category two career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(2) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage; (c) The funding unit's category three career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(3) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage; (d) The funding unit's category four career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(4) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage; (e) The funding unit's category five career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(5) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage. (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following: (a) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category one career-technical education ADM; (b) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category two career-technical education ADM; (c) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category three career-technical education ADM; (d) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category four career-technical education ADM; (e) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category five career-technical education ADM. (3) Payment of funds calculated under division (C) of this section is subject to approval under section 3317.161 of the Revised Code. (D) Subject to division (I) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, the department shall calculate career-technical associated services funds for each funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district or the community and STEM school unit as follows: (1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the following product: (If the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the funding unit's state share percentage) X the multiple for career-technical education associated services specified under division (B) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the sum of the funding unit's categories one through five career-technical education ADM (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's categories one through five career-technical education ADM. (E)(1) In accordance with division (I) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, the department shall compute career awareness and exploration funds for each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code that is part of a career technical planning district. The department shall pay the lead district in each career technical planning district as follows: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, an amount equal to the following product: The sum of enrolled ADM for all districts and schools within the career technical planning district X $3 (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly, if the general assembly authorizes such a payment to city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school districts, community schools, and STEM schools. (2) The lead district of a career technical planning district shall use career awareness and exploration funds in accordance with division (H) of this section. (F)(1) In any fiscal year, a school district receiving funds calculated under division (C) of this section shall spend those funds only for the purposes that the department designates as approved for career-technical education expenses. Career-technical education expenses approved by the department shall include only expenses connected to the delivery of career-technical programming to career-technical students. The department shall require the school district to report data annually so that the department may monitor the district's compliance with the requirements regarding the manner in which funding calculated under division (C) of this section may be spent. (2) All funds received under division (C) of this section shall be spent in the following manner: (a) At least seventy-five per cent of the funds shall be spent on curriculum development, purchase, and implementation; instructional resources and supplies; industry-based program certification; student assessment, credentialing, and placement; curriculum specific equipment purchases and leases; career-technical student organization fees and expenses; home and agency linkages; work-based learning experiences; professional development; and other costs directly associated with career-technical education programs including development of new programs. (b) Not more than twenty-five per cent of the funds shall be used for personnel expenditures. (G) In any fiscal year, a school district receiving funds calculated under division (D) of this section, or through a transfer of funds pursuant to division (I) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, shall spend those funds only for the purposes that the department designates as approved for career-technical education associated services expenses, which may include all of the following purposes: (1) Engaging and collaborating with education and workforce stakeholders in the service area; (2) Developing and maintaining a comprehensive plan to increase career-focused education activities; (3) Ensuring that plans are informed by quality data and using data to expand access to career-focused activities for all students; (4) Planning and allocating resources for the growth, sustainability, and enhancement of career-focused activities in the long term; (5) Establishing continuous improvement and program approval processes. The department may deny payment of funds calculated under division (D) of this section to any district that the department determines is not operating those services or is using funds calculated under division (D) of this section, or through a transfer of funds pursuant to division (I) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, for other purposes. (H) In any fiscal year, a lead district of a career-technical planning district receiving funds under division (E) of this section, shall utilize those funds to deliver relevant career awareness and exploration programs to all students within its career technical planning district in a manner that is consistent with the career-technical planning district's plan that is on file with the department. The lead district that receives funds under this division shall spend those funds only for the following purposes: (1) Delivery of career awareness programs to students enrolled in grades kindergarten through twelve; (2) Provision of a common, consistent curriculum to students throughout their primary and secondary education; (3) Assistance to teachers in providing a career development curriculum to students; (4) Development of a career development plan for each student that stays with that student for the duration of the student's primary and secondary education; (5) Provision of opportunities for students to engage in activities, such as career fairs, hands-on experiences, and job shadowing, across all career pathways at each grade level; (6) Provision of mentorship opportunities through which students may learn about careers and workforce skills; (7) Development, provision, or support of career exploration instruction under section 3313.6034 of the Revised Code. The lead district that receives funds under division (E) of this section shall report on the use of those funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the department. The department may deny payment under this division to any district or school that the department determines is using funds paid under this division for other purposes. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.6034, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6115, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.7118, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3319.90, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.474, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.6034, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6115, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.8110, 3313.89, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the school were a school district and the school's board of trustees were a district board of education. Section 2. That existing sections 3313.603, 3313.6020, 3313.617, 3314.03, 3317.014, 3326.11, and 3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That section 3313.607 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 4. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.